Arkansas, session 2025, SB4.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 116, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-116-108. Election for fluoridation of water — Definition.
(a) Customers of a public water system shall have the option to hold
an election of the qualified electors of the public water system to determine
whether or not the public water system shall fluoridate the water.
(b)(1) An election under this section may be called by:
(A) Majority vote of the board of directors of the public
water system;
(B) A petition signed by no less than ten percent (10%) of
the qualified electors in the public water system;
(C) Majority vote of the board of directors or city
council of a city supplied by the public water system; or
(D) Majority vote of the quorum court of a county supplied
by the public water system.
(2)(A) Except as provided under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
*SSS021*
11/20/2024 9:56:26 AM SSS021

SB4
section, an election under this section shall be held at the next general
election.
(B) A subsequent election in the public water system under
this section shall not be held earlier than four (4) years after an election
is held under this section.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the election under this
section shall be held and conducted in accordance with the general election
laws of this state.
(4) The question of whether to fluoridate the water in the
public water system shall be placed upon the ballots of the qualified
electors in the following form:
"___ FOR THE FLUORIDATION OF WATER IN [DESCRIPTION OF THE
PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM]
___ AGAINST THE FLUORIDATION OF WATER IN [DESCRIPTION OF
PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM].".
(c)(1) The petition under this section shall be filed with the county
clerk of each county within the public water system no less than one hundred
twenty (120) days before the general election.
(2) No more than ten (10) days after the filing of the petition
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the county clerk shall:
(A) Verify the petition;
(B) Certify the petition; and
(C) Notify the county boards of election commissioners for
the counties within the public water system and the board of directors of the
public water system of the verification and certification of the petition.
(3) The petition shall clearly state:
(A) The boundaries of the public water system; and
(B) That the petition is to elect "for" or "against"
fluoridation of the water in the public water system.
(d) If the majority of the qualified electors of the public water
system elect to prohibit fluoridation of water, the public water system shall
cease fluoridation of the water within thirty (30) days of the certification
of the election results.
(e) As used in this section, "public water system" means a facility,
including without limitation a parent system, consecutive system, or other
system, that holds, treats, and supplies water directly or through a
11/20/2024 9:56:26 AM

SB4
consecutive system or consecutive systems to five thousand (5,000) persons or
more.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-7-136(b), concerning a statewide
fluoridation program, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Unless a majority of the qualified electors of the public
water system have elected to prohibit fluoridation of water under § 14-116-
108, the company, corporation, municipality, county, government agency, or
other entity that owns or controls a water system shall control the quantity
of fluoride in the water so as to maintain a fluoride content established by
the Department of Health.

























11/20/2024 9:56:26 AM